Utah statutes.
32B-1-104.   Exercise of police powers -- Severability.

(1)  This title is an exercise of the police powers of the state for the protection of the public health, peace, safety, welfare, and morals, and regulates the storage, sale, offer for sale, furnishing, consumption, manufacture, and distribution of an alcoholic product.  This title governs alcoholic product control unless otherwise provided in this title.

(2)  If a provision of this title or the application of a provision to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this title shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application.  The provisions of this title are severable.

